Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1069
School districts; payments; conditions.

Prior to any payment to an impacted school district as provided in sections 79-1066 to 79-1069, the governing body of the public power district, public power and irrigation district, municipality, electric cooperative, electric membership corporation, or other entity constructing and owning such electric generating facility shall find and determine that such payment will promote the general health, welfare, and quality of education and will be in the best interests of the entity in its proprietary capacity and its relations with its employees, its contractors, and the public generally.

Laws 1981, LB 15, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 6, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1374;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 715.